District of Columbia statutes.
26-1153.02

Enforcement.

The Mayor may conduct examinations and investigations, and issue orders to enforce the provisions of this chapter, with respect to lenders over which it otherwise has jurisdiction. The Mayor may examine any relevant instrument, document, account, book, record, or file of a lender over which the Mayor has jurisdiction. The Mayor may recover the reasonable cost of the examinations and investigations from the lender. A lender shall maintain records which allow the Mayor to determine compliance with this chapter and any regulations promulgated hereunder.

History

May 7, 2002, D.C. Law 14-132, § 302, 49 DCR 2551

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition of section, see § 302 of Home Loan Protection Emergency Act of 2002 (D.C. Act 14-295, March 1, 2002, 49 DCR 2534).